Utah statutes.
31A-20-105.   Indemnity agreements for surety corporation.
In assessing the financial condition of a surety insurer and its underwriting
capacity and limits, the commissioner shall take into account the existence of
a systematic underwriting practice of indemnity or security arrangements under
Section 31A-22-104.
